Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.350

Voluntary waiver of firearm rights—Procedure—Penalty—Exemption from public disclosure.

(1) A person may file a voluntary waiver of firearm rights, either in writing or electronically, with the clerk of the court in any county in Washington state. The clerk of the court must request a physical or scanned copy of photo identification to verify the person's identity prior to accepting the form. The person filing the form may provide the name of a family member, mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or alternate person to be contacted if the filer attempts to purchase a firearm while the voluntary waiver of firearm rights is in effect or if the filer applies to have the voluntary waiver revoked. The clerk of the court must immediately give notice to the person filing the form and any listed family member, mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or alternate person if the filer's voluntary waiver of firearm rights has been accepted. The notice must state that the filer's possession or control of a firearm is unlawful under RCW 9.41.040(7) and that any firearm in the filer's possession or control should be surrendered immediately. By the end of the business day, the clerk of the court must transmit the accepted form to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program. The Washington state patrol firearms background check program must enter the voluntary waiver of firearm rights into the national instant criminal background check system and any other federal or state computer-based systems used by law enforcement agencies or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms within twenty-four hours of receipt of the form. Copies and records of the voluntary waiver of firearm rights shall not be disclosed except to law enforcement agencies.

(2) A filer of a voluntary waiver of firearm rights may update the contact information for any family member, mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or alternate person provided under subsection (1) of this section by making an electronic or written request to the clerk of the court in the same county where the voluntary waiver of firearm rights was filed. The clerk of the court must request a physical or scanned copy of photo identification to verify the person's identity prior to updating the contact information on the form. By the end of the business day, the clerk of the court must transmit the updated contact information to the Washington state patrol.

(3) No sooner than seven calendar days after filing a voluntary waiver of firearm rights, the person may file a revocation of the voluntary waiver of firearm rights, either in writing or electronically, in the same county where the voluntary waiver of firearm rights was filed. The clerk of the court must request a physical or scanned copy of photo identification to verify the person's identity prior to accepting the form. By the end of the business day, the clerk of the court must transmit the form to the Washington state patrol firearms background check program and to any family member, mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or alternate person listed on the voluntary waiver of firearm rights. Within seven days of receiving a revocation of a voluntary waiver of firearm rights, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program must remove the person from the national instant criminal background check system, and any other federal or state computer-based systems used by law enforcement agencies or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms in which the person was entered, unless the person is otherwise ineligible to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040, and destroy all records of the voluntary waiver.

(4) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding their identity on the voluntary waiver of firearm rights form or revocation of waiver of firearm rights form is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(5) Neither a voluntary waiver of firearm rights nor a revocation of a voluntary waiver of firearm rights shall be considered by a court in any legal proceeding.

(6) A voluntary waiver of firearm rights may not be required of an individual as a condition for receiving employment, benefits, or services.

(7) All records obtained and all reports produced, as required by this section, are not subject to disclosure through the public records act under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2024 c 289 s 5; 2023 c 262 s 3; 2018 c 145 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 289: See note following RCW 9.41.111.

Effective date—2018 c 145 ss 1, 3, and 4: "Sections 1, 3, and 4 of this act take effect January 1, 2019." [ 2018 c 145 s 5.]